Florida, session 2026, HB6531.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
163
164 Section 1. The facts stated in the preamble to this act
165 are found and declared to be true.
166 Section 2. The Broward County Sheriff's Office is
167 authorized and directed to appropriate from funds not otherwise
168 encumbered, or Broward County is authorized to appropriate from
169 funds that would otherwise be payable for expenses incurred by
170 the Broward County Sheriff's Office, and to draw a warrant in
171 the sum of $2,588,258.50 payable to a trust for the exclusive
172 benefit of D.N., M.N.'s sole surviving sibling, as compensation
173 for injuries and damages sustained.
174 Section 3. The amount paid by the Broward County Sheriff's
175 Office pursuant to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the amount
Page 7 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6531 -02-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 6531, Engrossed 1 2026
176 awarded under this act are intended to provide the sole
177 compensation for all present and future claims arising out of
178 the factual situation described in this act which resulted in
179 injuries and damages to the Estate of M.N. The total amount paid
180 for attorney fees relating to this claim may not exceed 25
181 percent of the total amount awarded under this act.
182 Section 4. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 8 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6531 -02-e1